Massachusetts, session 194th, S286.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 185I of chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following section:-
Section 185J. (a) The following words as used in this section, unless the context
otherwise requires, shall have the following meaning:—
“Event ticket”, a physical, electronic, or other form of a certificate, document, voucher,
or token to any concert, theatrical performance, sporting event, exhibition, show, or similar
activity taking place in the Commonwealth.
“Software”, any computer program primarily designed or produced for the purpose of
purchasing tickets from a ticket issuer for the purpose of resale on the secondary market.
of 2

“Ticket issuer”, a person or company that makes initial event tickets available directly to
the general public in the primary market.
“Ticket reseller”, any form of transfer or alienation, or offering for transfer or alienation,
of possession of an event ticket from one person to another, with or without consideration,
whether in person or by means of telephone, mail, delivery service, facsimile, internet, email or
other electronic means. “Ticket reseller” does not include the initial sale of an event ticket by the
ticket issuer.
(b) No ticket issuer shall pre-sell any event ticket to a ticket reseller for the purposes of
selling tickets in the secondary market.
A ticket reseller of event tickets shall be prohibited from using any software or other
technology for the purpose, or with the foreseeable effect, of restricting the sale of event tickets
to the general public within twenty-four hours of when the tickets go on sale.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2